Utah statutes.
78B-12-402.   Duties -- Report -- Staff.

(1)  The advisory committee shall review the child support guidelines to ensure their application results in the determination of appropriate child support award amounts.

(2)  The committee shall report to the Legislative Judiciary Interim Committee on or before October 1, 2015, and then on or before October 1 of every fourth year subsequently.

(3)  The committee's report shall include recommendations of the majority of the committee, as well as specific recommendations of individual members of the committee.

(4)  Staff for the committee shall be provided from the existing budget of the Department of Human Services.

